Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle C. Delegation; Affiliates.

§ 81-27-3.201.
Delegation and fiduciary responsibility.

Any person acting as a trustee or as any other fiduciary under the laws of this state may delegate any investment, management or administrative function if such person exercises reasonable care, judgment and caution in:

Selecting the delegate, taking into account the delegate’s financial standing and reputation;

Establishing the scope and other terms of any delegation; and

Reviewing periodically the delegate’s actions in order to monitor overall performance and compliance with the scope and other terms of the delegation.

Notwithstanding any delegation permitted by subsection (a) of this section, any person acting as a trustee or in any other fiduciary capacity under the laws of this state shall retain responsibility for the due performance of any delegated fiduciary function.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-3.202.
Affiliates.

Any person acting as a trustee or in any other fiduciary capacity under Section 81-27-3.201 may hire and compensate, as a delegate, an affiliate of such person if:

Authorized by a trust or fiduciary instrument;

Authorized by court order;

Authorized in writing by each affected client; or

The standards of Section 81-27-3.201 are satisfied.

Fees paid to an affiliate shall be competitive with fees charged by nonaffiliates that provide substantially similar services; however, if an affiliate is used pursuant to subsection (a)(4) of this section, the amount of fees paid to the affiliate shall also be consistent with best execution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.